Massachusetts, session 194th, H1382.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 9A of chapter 118E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
(17)(a) Residents of the commonwealth under age 19 who are enrolled in MassHealth
shall qualify for at least 12 months of continuous eligibility.
(b) Continuous eligibility established under clause (a) shall not apply in the following
circumstances: (i) the child turns 19, except when MassHealth provides continuous eligibility to
residents over age 19; (ii) the child ceases to be a state resident; (iii) the child or the child’s
representative requests voluntary disenrollment; (iv) eligibility is determined to have been
of 2

erroneously granted because of agency error or fraud, abuse, or perjury attributed to the child or
the child’s representative; or (v) the child is deceased.
(c) The executive office of health and human services shall maximize federal financial
participation for the coverage and benefits under this subsection; provided, however, that
coverage and benefits provided under this subsection shall not only be contingent upon the
availability of federal financial participation.
of 2